test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-gurt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Noun - гурт: # Noun  гурт 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom: гурт
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc: гуртэз
#     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+Dial/North: гуртты
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen: гуртлэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl: гуртлэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat: гуртлы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins: гуртэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe: гурттэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl: гуртъя
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine: гуртын
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill: гуртэ
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela: гуртысь
     гурт+N+Sg+Egr: гуртысен
     гурт+N+Sg+Ter: гуртозь
     гурт+N+Sg+Prl: гуртэтӥ
     гурт+N+Sg+Apr: гуртлань

     гурт+N+Pl+Nom: гуртъёс
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc: гуртъёсыз
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen: гуртъёслэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl: гуртъёслэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat: гуртъёслы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins: гуртъёсын
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe: гуртъёстэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl: гуртъёсъя
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine: гуртъёсын
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill: гуртъёсы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela: гуртъёсысь
     гурт+N+Pl+Egr: гуртъёсысен
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter: гуртъёсозь
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl: гуртъёсэтӥ
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr: гуртъёслань

     # possessive, and Cx-Px / Px-Cx

     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: гуртэ
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: гуртэд
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: гуртэз
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: гуртмы
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: гуртты
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: гуртсы

     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: гуртъёсы
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: гуртъёсыд
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: гуртъёсыз
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: гуртъёсмы
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: гуртъёсты
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: гуртъёссы

     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: гуртме
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: гурттэ
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: гуртсэ
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: гуртмес
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: гурттэс
     гурт+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: гуртсэс

     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: гуртъёсме
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: гуртъёстэ
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: гуртъёссэ
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: гуртъёсмес
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: гуртъёстэс
     гурт+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: гуртъёссэс

     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: гуртэлэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: гуртэдлэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: гуртэзлэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: гуртмылэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: гурттылэн
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: гуртсылэн

     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: гуртъёсылэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: гуртъёсыдлэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: гуртъёсызлэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: гуртъёсмылэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: гуртъёстылэн
     гурт+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: гуртъёссылэн

     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: гуртэлэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: гуртэдлэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: гуртэзлэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: гуртмылэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: гурттылэсь
     гурт+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: гуртсылэсь

     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: гуртъёсылэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: гуртъёсыдлэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: гуртъёсызлэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: гуртъёсмылэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: гуртъёстылэсь
     гурт+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: гуртъёссылэсь

     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: гуртэлы
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: гуртэдлы
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: гуртэзлы
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: гуртмылы
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: гурттылы
     гурт+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: гуртсылы

     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: гуртъёсылы
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: гуртъёсыдлы
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: гуртъёсызлы
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: гуртъёсмылы
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: гуртъёстылы
     гурт+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: гуртъёссылы

     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: гуртэным
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: гуртэныд
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: гуртэныз
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: гуртэнымы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: гуртэныды
     гурт+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: гуртэнызы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: гуртъёсыным
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: гуртъёсыныд
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: гуртъёсыныз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: гуртъёсынымы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: гуртъёсыныды
     гурт+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: гуртъёсынызы

     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: гуртэтэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: гуртэдтэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: гуртэзтэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: гуртмытэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: гурттытэк
     гурт+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: гуртсытэк

     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: гуртъёсытэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: гуртъёсыдтэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: гуртъёсызтэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: гуртъёсмытэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: гуртъёстытэк
     гурт+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: гуртъёссытэк

     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg1: гуртэя
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg2: гуртэдъя
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg3: гуртэзъя
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl1: гуртмыя
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl2: гурттыя
     гурт+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl3: гуртсыя

     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg1: гуртъёсыя
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg2: гуртъёсыдъя
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg3: гуртъёсызъя
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl1: гуртъёсмыя
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl2: гуртъёстыя
     гурт+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl3: гуртъёссыя

     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: гуртам
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: гуртад
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: гуртаз
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: гуртамы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: гуртады
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: гуртазы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: гуртъёсам
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: гуртъёсад
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: гуртъёсаз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: гуртъёсамы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: гуртъёсады
     гурт+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: гуртъёсазы

     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: гуртам
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: гуртад
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: гуртаз
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: гуртамы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: гуртады
     гурт+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: гуртазы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: гуртъёсам
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: гуртъёсад
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: гуртъёсаз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: гуртъёсамы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: гуртъёсады
     гурт+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: гуртъёсазы

     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: гуртысьтым
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: гуртысьтыд
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: гуртысьтыз
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: гуртысьтымы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: гуртысьтыды
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: гуртысьтызы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: гуртъёсысьтым
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: гуртъёсысьтыд
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: гуртъёсысьтыз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: гуртъёсысьтымы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: гуртъёсысьтыды
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: гуртъёсысьтызы

     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: гуртысеным
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: гуртысеныд
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: гуртысеныз
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: гуртысенымы
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: гуртысеныды
     гурт+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: гуртысенызы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: гуртъёсысеным
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: гуртъёсысеныд
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: гуртъёсысеныз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: гуртъёсысенымы
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: гуртъёсысеныды
     гурт+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: гуртъёсысенызы

     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: гуртозям
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: гуртозяд
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: гуртозяз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: [гуртозямы, гуртмыозь]
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: [гуртозяды, гурттыозь]
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: [гуртозязы, гуртсыозь]

     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: гуртъёсозям
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: гуртъёсозяд
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: гуртъёсозяз
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: гуртъёсмыозь
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: гуртъёстыозь
     гурт+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: гуртъёссыозь

     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: гуртэтӥм
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: гуртэтӥд
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: гуртэтӥз
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: гуртэтӥмы
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: гуртэтӥды
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: гуртэтӥзы

     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: гуртъёсэтӥм
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: гуртъёсэтӥд
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: гуртъёсэтӥз
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: гуртъёсэтӥмы
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: гуртъёсэтӥды
     гурт+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: гуртъёсэтӥзы

     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: гуртэлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: гуртэдлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: гуртэзлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: гуртмылань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: гурттылань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: гуртсылань

     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: гуртъёсэлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: гуртъёсэдлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: гуртъёсэзлань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: гуртъёсмылань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: гуртъёстылань
     гурт+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: гуртъёссылань
